Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2907
Council; powers and duties; members; expenses.

(1) The council shall advise the director on the administration of the Dispute Resolution Act.

(2) The council shall meet at least four times per year and at other times deemed necessary to perform its functions. Members of the council shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(3) The council may appoint task forces to carry out its work. Task force members shall have knowledge of, responsibility for, or interest in an area related to the duties of the council.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 21.